Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2754.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-299A of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma
Rural Hospitals Funding Assistance Grant Program Act of 2025".
B. There is hereby established the Oklahoma Rural Hospitals
Funding Assistance Grant Program.


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2754 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

C. As used in the Oklahoma Rural Hospitals Funding Assistance
Grant Program Act of 2025: "Adequate medical care facilities" means
facilities that:
1. Would meet or meets the eligibility of a federally qualified
critical access hospital;
2. Are located in a town or municipality with fewer than five
thousand (5,000) population according to the most recent Federal
Decennial Census; and
3. Is owned by a public trust organized under the laws of this
state or by a town or municipality of this state.
D. The State Department of Health shall administer the Oklahoma
Rural Hospitals Funding Assistance Grant Program to support the
state purpose of ensuring the health and safety of the residents of
the state by facilitating adequate access to health care services in
rural areas of the state. Such grant program shall embody the
following procedures, criteria, and limitations:
1. The Department shall develop a rubric of analysis and
accompanying application process to identify and prioritize rural
areas for grant funding, where such populations are
disproportionately impacted from accessing adequate medical care
facilities, due to distance;
2. No grant amount shall be awarded by the Department under the
provisions of this act that would exceed the cumulative total of
funds directed for deposit to the Oklahoma Rural Hospitals Funding
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2754 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Assi stance Grant Program Revolving Fund created by Section 2 of this
act.
E. The State Department of Health is hereby authorized to adopt
rules and procedures as necessary to carry out the provisions of
this act.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-299B of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the State Department of Health to be designated the "Oklahoma
Rural Hospitals Funding Assistance Grant Program Revolving Fund".
The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year
limitations, and shall consist of all monies directed for deposit to
the fund by law. All monies accruing to the credit of said fund are
hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the State
Department of Health in accordance with the provisions provided in
Section 1 of this act. Expenditures from said fund shall be made
upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as
prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2754 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS
April 23, 2025 - DO PASS





















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2754 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)